Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202668-996
Medicaid Managed Care Excess Profit Fund; created; use; investment.

(1) The Medicaid Managed Care Excess Profit Fund is created. The fund shall contain money returned to the State Treasurer pursuant to subdivision (1)(c) of section 68-995.

(2) The fund shall first be used to offset any losses under subdivision (1)(b) of section 68-995 and then to provide for (a) services addressing the health needs of adults and children under the Medical Assistance Act, including filling service gaps, (b) system improvements, (c) evidence-based early intervention home visitation programs, (d) medical respite services, (e) translation and interpretation services, (f) coverage for continuous glucose monitors as described in section 68-911, (g) other services sustaining access to care, (h) services under the Nebraska Prenatal Plus Program, (i) grants pursuant to the Intergenerational Care Facility Incentive Grant Program, (j) evidence-based nurse home visiting services, (k) domestic violence services, (l) reimbursement of the actual costs of providing eligible activities and services described in section 81-2222, and (m) the Family Resource and Juvenile Assessment Center Pilot Program, as determined by the Legislature. The fund shall only be used for the purposes described in this section.

(3) Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. Beginning October 1, 2024, any investment earnings from investment of money in the fund shall be credited to the General Fund.

Laws 2020, LB1158, § 3;

Laws 2024, LB62, § 3;

Laws 2024, LB857, § 9;

Laws 2024, LB904, § 3;

Laws 2024, LB905, § 2;

Laws 2024, LB1413, § 43;

Laws 2024, First Spec. Sess., LB3, § 25;

Laws 2025, LB22, § 11;

Laws 2025, LB48, § 12;

Laws 2025, LB264, § 147;

Laws 2025, LB380, § 8;

Laws 2025, LB382, § 1.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.